California, session 20252026, AB1040.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2021 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2021. (a) A person who leaves his or her the person’s home to go into another state or precinct in this state for temporary purposes merely, with the intention of returning, does not lose his or her the person’s domicile.(b) A person does not gain a domicile in any precinct into which he or she the person comes for temporary purposes merely, without the intention of making that precinct his or her the person’s home.(c) A person who leaves their home for temporary purposes because of a natural disaster, and who intends to return to that home or to another address within the same jurisdiction, does not lose their domicile at that home. The person may provide a temporary mailing address without losing their domicile at that home.